en_rules
// ***************************************************************************
// *   Copyright (C) 2005 to 2013 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
// *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Conditional rules
// ?3  General American
// ?!3  Not General American
// ?5  split [3:] er [3:], ir [IR], ur [VR] 
// ?6  'one' = [wVn], 'of' = [Vv]
// ?7  Scottish
// ?8  Use full vowel, not schwa in some word endings


// Group Y, vowels + y
.L01  l r
.L02  i y
.L03  a i o u   // vowel, not 'e'
.L05  c g k
.L06  s z
.L07  b d g  m n r  bE dE lE nE   // before voiced s in -sman
.L08  t d s z n x    // dental, drop [j] before [u:]

.L10  grap log met scop  // scientific endings


.replace
   ﬀ   ff     // ligature
   ﬁ   fi
   ﬂ   fl


.group a
            a            a
         _) a's (_       eIz
         -) a (-         a#
         _) a (-         'eI
         _) a (-half     a#
         X) a ($w_alt3+++++ a#
        sw) a (B         0
            a (Be#       eI
         w) a (Be#       eI
            a (Cee+      a
            a (BeCo_     a
            a (BerA      a
            a (BeroA#    eI
            a (BerC      a
            a (Bet       a
         @) a (Bia       'eI
            a (Bing      E
         @) a (Biu       'eI
            a (Bo_       'A:
            a (Bu_       'A:
        XC) a (By_       eI
            a (Ca_       'A:
            a (Cability  eI
            a (Cable     'eI
            a (Cably     'eI
         n) a (Cal       eI
            a (Cible     'eI
         &) a (_         @
         _) a (_         a#
        &b) a (_         =@
        D_) a (_         eI
        XC) a (_         A:
        lt) a (_         =@
         _) a (_-       eI
         _) a (_D        ,eI
            aa           A:
        aa) aa           a:
            aa (a        a:
            aar          'A@
         w) a (b         0
        gl) a (ci        eI
         r) a (ciA       eI
         w) a (d         0
        ow) a (d         @
            ae           i:
            aea          'i@
         @) aed (_S2     d
            ae (l        eI
            aeg (er      eIg
         h) ae (m        i:
         h) aemorrh      Em3r
         _) ae (on       i:
            aer          e@
         r) aer          'A@
        _c) aer          %e@
         _) aer (o       e@
         _) aero         e@roU
            aero (plan   e@r@
            aero (sol    e@r@
         m) ae (st       aI
            ae (val      'i:
        sw) a (g         a
            ah (K        A:
            ahr (_N      A@
         &) ah (_        @
         m) a (hog       @
         m) a (jes       a
         m) a (jor_      eI
         m) a (jore      eI
         _) a (ki        a#
         @) a (ki_       'a
         @) ak (ia       ak
            aku (_       'A:ku:
        sw) a (m_        a
        sw) a (nk        a
            ao           eI0
         m) ao           aU
         t) ao           aU
            ao (_        =aU
            aois (_      i:S
            aoise (_     i:S@
         g) ao (l        eI@
            aor          eI'o@
         m) ao (ri       aU
         _) a (qu        %a
            aqu (a       akw
            aqu (ariA    a#kw
            aqua (t      @kwa
            aque (o      eIkwI
            aqui         akwI
         w) a (s         0
       squ) a (sh        0
            a (sion      eI
        er) a (sur       eI
         w) a (tc        0
         w) a (ter       O:
         l) a (th        aa
        sw) a (th        eI
            a (the_+     eI
         p) a (tien      eI
       irr) a (tio       a
            a (tion      'eI
        _r) a (tion      a
         n) a (tional    a
         @) a (tious     'eI
         n) a (tur       eI
         n) a (tura      a
         &) a (ture_     @
      sign) a (ture      I
         _) a (ve        a
         _) a (viat      eI
         _) a (von       eI
            aw           O:
            a (wA        a
         _) aw (a+       a#w
            awal         O:l
            a (way_      @
         _) awe          O:
            awe (B       O:
            awe (_       O:
         _) aw (f        O:
         _) a (wh@       a#
         @) awi (_       'A:wI
         _) aw (k        O:
         _) aw (ok       a#w
            awr (_       aU@
            awy (er_     OI
         C) a (x+        a
         _) a (x+        a
            ay           eI
         _) ay           aI
         w) ay           eI
         _) ayle         eI@L
         _) ayr          e@
         h) a (zA        eI
        Kl) a (zY        eI
        sw) a (z         A:
         r) a (zi        eI
         h) a (zar       'a
         g) a (zeC%      @
        @k) aze (_       'A:zI
         @) a (zi_       'A:
            a (zide      'eI
        br) a (zil       a
        bl) a (zon       eI
         r) azor         eIz3
            a (zy        eI
            a (zz_       'a
         k) a (zoo       a#

.group ab
         _) ab (@        a#b
            ab (acA      ab
         @) abad (_      =a#bad
            ab (att      ab
         _) abb          ab
         _) abbo         ab@
         _) abb (rev    a#b
         _) ab (d        ab
         _) ab (duc      a#b

         _) abel         eIb@L
         _) aber (@      ,ab3
         C) aber (@      ab3
        _s) aber (@      eIb3
         _) aber (ran    a#bE
         _) ab (i        ab
         _) ab (ide      a#b
        _l) ab (i        eIb
        st) ab (il       eIb
         C) ab (ilit+    @b
            ab (ject     ab
            ab (lativ    ab
            able         eIb@L
            abling       'eIblIN
            ably         eIblI
       _en) ab (l        'eIb
        XC) ab (le       eIb
       _un) ab (le       'eIb
      _dis) ab (le       'eIb
            ab (neg      ab
            ab (olit     ,ab
         _) ab (ori      ,ab
         l) ab (our      eIb
         _) above (@P5   a#b,Vv
         _) ab (ram      eIb
         _) ab (ra       a#b
         _) ab (rac      ab
            ab (rog      ab
            ab (ruc      ab
            ab (sce      ab
            ab (sei      ab
         _) ab (sen      ab
         _) abse (ntC    ,abs@
            ab (solu     ab
            ab (sti      ab
            ab (ular     'ab
         b) ab (y        eIb
         b) ab (yl       ab
         &) able (_S4iev  @b@L         // suffix
        et) able (_S4     @b@L
         &) able (_$w_alt1 eIb@L
       min) able (_       @b@L
        &c) able (_       @b@L
       @ct) able (_      =@b@L
         &) ability (S7iev    @b'IlI2t%i    // suffix
         &) abilities (S9iev  @b'IlI2t%iz    // suffix
         &) ably (_S4iefv     @bl%I
        &c) ably (_S4fv       @bl%I
       min) ably (_      @bl%I

.group ac
         _) ac (@        a#k
         _) acc (@       a#k
         _) acc (e       a#ks
         _) acqu         a#kw
            aca (dem     ak@
            aca (demy    a#ka
         v) ac (a        eIk
            ac (a_       'ak
            ac (cent     ak
            ac (centu    %ak
            acci (_      'A:tSi
            ac (cid      ak
            acc (ol      ak
            accou (t     a#ku:
            accu (ra     akjU
            accus (A     a#kju:z
            ace (_       eIs
            ace (_$w_alt2 I#s
        sp) ac (e#       eIs
        _r) ace          eIs
        _r) ace (m       a#si:
         _) ac (e        a#s
        _r) ac (is       eIs
            acean (_     'eIS@n
        pl) ac (at       a#k
?3     _pl) ac (at       eIk
        pl) ac (eb       @s
       _pl) ac (ent      @s
         m) acher (_     A:k3
            ac (erb      as
         _) ac (erbi     a#s
         _) ace (t       asI
         _) ace (ti      a#si:
         _) ache (+      eIk
         d) ache (_      eIk
         h) ache (_      eIk
         k) ache (_      eIk
         r) ache (_      eIk
        rt) ache (_      eIk
         y) ache (_      eIk
         d) aches (_     eIks
         h) aches (_     eIks
         k) aches (_     eIks
         r) aches (_     eIks
        rt) aches (_     eIks
        tr) ach (e       @k
         _) ach          a#tS
            achia        'eIS@
         f) ac (ilit     @s
        _m) ace (d       asI
         b) ach (_       A:x
         m) achi (nA#    @Si:
         m) achina (t    akI2neI
            ach (rom     ak
            ac (id_      as
         _) ac (i        a#s
            acious       'eIS@s
         _) ack          ak
         _) ack (n       a#k
         &) ac (le_      @k
         _) ac (o        ak
            ac (on       ak
            ac (orn      eIk
            acme         akmI
            acne         aknI
            acou (st     a#ku:
            ac (quie     ,a
         _) acre         eIk3
      mass) acre         @k3
         _) ac (ri       ak
            ac (ro       ak
         m) acro (@      akr@
            ac (rum_     'eIk
         _) ac (t        ak
            ac (tory     'ak
            actu (A      aktSu:
            ac (ture     'ak
            ac (um       ak
            ac (up       ak
            ac (ular     'ak
       urf) ac (e_       Is
        @n) ac (e_       Is
       sol) ac (e_       Is
        al) ac (e_       Is
        im) ac (e_       Is
        rr) ac (e_       Is
        _b) ac (o        eIk
         y) ach (t       0
         &) ac (y_       @s
        cr) ac (y_       =@s
